Georgia, session 2025_26, HB39.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) The clerk of the Magistrate Court of Habersham County shall be entitled to charge and
collect a technology fee to be set by the chief magistrate in an amount not to exceed $10.00
for the filing of each civil action or proceeding with the court and not to exceed $10.00 as
a surcharge upon each fine assessed by the court. Such technology fees shall be used
exclusively to provide for the technological needs of the Magistrate Court of Habersham
County. Such uses shall include only the following:
(1) Computer hardware and software purchases;
(2) Lease, maintenance, and installation of computer hardware and software;
H. B. 39
- 1 -

LC 47 3126/AP
(3) Purchase, lease, maintenance, and installation of audio-visual, imaging, scanning,
facsimile, communications, recording, projection, and printing equipment and software;
(4) Purchase or lease of data storage;
(5) Purchase of local or remote technological support services and equipment which may
be used to connect to cellular radio systems, remote internet, and any other remote access
system;
(6) Lease, purchase, maintenance, and installation of platforms, user agreements, and
licenses for online, remote or cloud based document storage platforms; and
(7) Cybersecurity insurance.
(b) The funds collected pursuant to this section shall be maintained in a segregated account
by the clerk of the Magistrate Court of Habersham County and shall be used only for the
purposes authorized in this section.
(c) The authority to assess a technology fee pursuant to this section shall terminate on July 1,
2044, and any funds remaining in the fund established by this section shall remain dedicated
to general Habersham County technology uses.
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
An Act to authorize the assessment, collection, and distribution of a technology fee by the
Magistrate Court of Habersham County, approved April 22, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024, p. 3614), is
hereby repealed in its entirety.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 39
- 2 -